District of Columbia statutes.
48-833.04

Department reports.

By November 30th of each year, the Department shall provide an annual report, providing information in aggregate form, on prescription drug marketing expenses to the Council and the Corporation Counsel. By January 1, 2005, and every 2 years thereafter, the Department shall provide a report to the Council and the Corporation Counsel, providing information in aggregate form, containing an analysis of the data submitted to the Department, including the scope of prescription drug marketing activities and expenses and their effect on the cost, utilization, and delivery of health care services, and any recommendations with regard to marketing activities of prescription drug manufacturers and labelers.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 304, 51 DCR 3688